Washington statutes.
RCW 18.260.130

Application of uniform disciplinary act.

Chapter 18.130 RCW governs unregistered or unlicensed practice, the issuance and denial of credentials, and the discipline of those credentialed under this chapter. The commission is the disciplining authority under this chapter.

[ 2007 c 269 s 13.]